Utah statutes.
48-2c-1809.   Limitations on indemnification.

(1)  A provision treating a company's indemnification of, or advance for expenses to, managers or members that is contained in its articles of organization or operating agreement or in a resolution of its members or in a contract, except an insurance policy, or otherwise, is valid only if and to the extent the provision is not inconsistent with this part.  If the articles of organization limit indemnification or advancement of expenses, indemnification and advancement of expenses are valid only to the extent not inconsistent with the articles of organization.

(2)  This part does not limit a company's power to pay or reimburse expenses incurred by a manager or member in connection with the manager's or member's appearance as a witness in a proceeding at a time when the manager or member has not been made a named defendant or respondent in the proceeding.

